California statutes. Probate Code
(b) Where there is more than one personal representative, one personal representative is liable for a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another of the personal representatives under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Where the personal representative participates in a breach of fiduciary duty committed by the other personal representative.

(2) Where the personal representative improperly delegates the administration of the estate to the other personal representative.

(3) Where the personal representative approves, knowingly acquiesces in, or conceals a breach of fiduciary duty committed by the other personal representative.

(4) Where the personal representative’s negligence enables the other personal representative to commit a breach of fiduciary duty.

(5) Where the personal representative knows or has information from which the personal representative reasonably should have known of the breach of fiduciary duty by the other personal representative and fails to take reasonable steps to compel the other personal representative to redress the breach.

(c) The liability of a personal representative for a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another of the personal representatives that occurred before July 1, 1988, is governed by prior law and not by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Independent Administration [9640. - 9640.]

9640.

Nothing in this part limits or restricts any authority granted to a personal representative under the Independent Administration of Estates Act (Part 6 (commencing with Section 10400)) to administer the estate under that part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Transitional Provision [9645. - 9645.]

9645.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), any petition or other matter filed or commenced before July 1, 1988, shall be continued under this part, so far as applicable, except where the court determines that application of a particular provision of this part would substantially interfere with the rights of the parties or other interested persons, in which case the particular provision of this part does not apply and the applicable law in effect before July 1, 1988, applies.

(b) Nothing in this part affects any order, judgment, or decree made, or any action taken, before July 1, 1988.

(c) Notwithstanding the enactment of this part:

(1) An order, judgment, or decree made before July 1, 1988, shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with its terms or until modified or terminated by the court.

(2) The validity of an order, judgment, or decree made before July 1, 1988, is determined by the applicable law in effect before July 1, 1988, and not by this part.

(3) The validity of any action taken before July 1, 1988, is determined by the applicable law in effect before July 1, 1988, and not by this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Estate Management Generally [9650. - 9657.]

9650.

(a) Except as provided by statute and subject to subdivision (c):

(1) The personal representative has the right to, and shall take possession or control of, all the property of the decedent to be administered in the decedent’s estate and shall collect all debts due to the decedent or the estate. The personal representative is not accountable for any debts that remain uncollected without his or her fault.

(2) The personal representative is entitled to receive the rents, issues, and profits from the real and personal property in the estate until the estate is distributed.

(b) The personal representative shall pay taxes on, and take all steps reasonably necessary for the management, protection, and preservation of, the estate in his or her possession.

(c) Real property or tangible personal property may be left with or surrendered to the person presumptively entitled to it unless or until, in the judgment of the personal representative, possession of the property by the personal representative will be necessary for purposes of administration. The person holding the property shall surrender it to the personal representative on request by the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9651.

(a) A personal representative who in good faith takes into possession real or personal property, and reasonably believes that the property is part of the estate of the decedent, is not:

(1) Criminally liable for so doing.

(2) Civilly liable to any person for so doing.

(b) The personal representative shall make reasonable efforts to determine the true nature of, and title to, the property so taken into possession.

(c) During his or her possession, the personal representative is entitled to receive all rents, issues, and profits of the property. If the property is later determined not to be part of the estate of the decedent, the personal representative shall deliver the property, or cause it to be delivered, to the person legally entitled to it, together with all rents, issues, and profits of the property received by the personal representative, less any expenses incurred in protecting and maintaining the property and in collecting rents, issues, and profits. The personal representative may request court approval before delivering the property pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) The court may allow the personal representative reasonable compensation for services rendered in connection with the duties specified in this section as to property later determined not to be part of the estate of the decedent, if the court makes one of the following findings:

(1) The services were of benefit to the estate. If the court makes this finding, the compensation and the expenses and costs of litigation, including attorney’s fees of the attorney hired by the personal representative to handle the matter, are a proper expense of administration.

(2) The services were essential to preserve, protect, and maintain the property. If the court makes this finding, the court shall award compensation and the expenses and costs of litigation, including attorney’s fees of the attorney hired by the personal representative to handle the matter, as an expense deductible from the rents, issues, and profits received by the personal representative, or, if these are insufficient, as a lien against the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9652.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the personal representative shall keep all cash in his or her possession invested in interest-bearing accounts or other investments authorized by law.

(b) The requirement of subdivision (a) does not apply to the amount of cash that is reasonably necessary for orderly administration of the estate.

(c) The requirement of subdivision (a) does not apply to the extent that the testator’s will otherwise provides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9653.

(a) On application of a creditor of the decedent or the estate, the personal representative shall commence and prosecute an action for the recovery of real or personal property of the decedent for the benefit of creditors if the personal representative has insufficient assets to pay creditors and the decedent during lifetime did any of the following with respect to the property:

(1) Made a conveyance of the property, or any right or interest in the property, that is voidable as to creditors under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(2) Made a gift of the property in
 view of impending death.

(3) Made a direction to transfer a vehicle, undocumented vessel, manufactured home, mobilehome, commercial coach, truck camper, or floating home to a designated beneficiary on the decedent’s death pursuant to Section 18102.2 of the Health and Safety Code, or Section 5910.5 or 9916.5 of the Vehicle Code, and the property has been transferred as directed.

(b) A creditor making application under this section shall pay such part of the costs and expenses of the suit and attorney’s fees, or give an undertaking to the personal representative for that purpose, as the personal representative and the creditor agree, or, absent an agreement, as the court or judge orders.

(c) The property recovered under this section shall be sold for the payment of debts in the same manner as if the decedent had died
 seized or possessed of the property. The proceeds of the sale shall be applied first to payment of the costs and expenses of suit, including attorney’s fees, and then to payment of the debts of the decedent in the same manner as other property in possession of the personal representative. After all the debts of the decedent have been paid, the remainder of the proceeds shall be paid to the person from whom the property was recovered. The property may be sold in its entirety or in such portion as necessary to pay the debts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 27.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9654.

The heirs or devisees may themselves, or jointly with the personal representative, maintain an action for possession of property or to quiet title to property against any person except the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9655.

With respect to a share of stock of a domestic or foreign corporation held in the estate, a membership in a nonprofit corporation held in the estate, or other property held in the estate, a personal representative may do any one or more of the following:

(a) Vote in person, and give proxies to exercise, any voting rights with respect to the share, membership, or other property.

(b) Waive notice of a meeting or give consent to the holding of a meeting.

(c) Authorize, ratify, approve, or confirm any action which could be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9656.

The personal representative may insure the property of the estate against damage or loss and may insure himself or herself against liability to third persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9657.

The personal representative shall not make profit by the increase, nor suffer loss by the decrease or destruction without his or her fault, of any part of the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Deposit of Money and Personal Property With Financial Institutions [9700. - 9705.]

9700.

The personal representative may deposit money of the estate in an insured account in a financial institution in this state. Unless otherwise provided by court order, the money may be withdrawn without order of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9701.

The personal representative may deposit personal property of the estate with a trust company for safekeeping. Unless otherwise provided by court order, the personal property may be withdrawn without order of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9702.

(a) A trust company serving as personal representative may deposit securities that constitute all or part of the estate in a securities depository, as provided in Section 1612 of the Financial Code.

(b) If securities have been deposited with a trust company by a personal representative pursuant to Section 9701, the trust company may deposit the securities in a securities depository, as provided in Section 1612 of the Financial Code.

(c) The securities depository may hold securities deposited with it in the manner authorized by Section 1612 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 139.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9703.

(a) Upon application of the personal representative, the court may, with or without notice, order that money or other personal property be deposited pursuant to Section 9700 or 9701 and be subject to withdrawal only upon authorization of the court.

(b) The personal representative shall deliver a copy of the court order to the financial institution or trust company at the time the deposit is made.

(c) No financial institution or trust company accepting a deposit pursuant to Section 9700 or 9701 shall be on notice of the existence of an order that the money or other property is subject to withdrawal only upon authorization of the court unless it has actual notice of the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9704.

When an order for distribution of money or personal property deposited pursuant to this chapter is made, the financial institution, trust company, or securities depository may deliver the property directly to the distributees and shall file receipts therefor with the clerk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9705.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), where a trust company is a personal representative and in the exercise of reasonable judgment deposits money of the estate in an account in any department of the corporation or association of which it is a part, it is chargeable with interest thereon at the rate of interest prevailing among banks of the locality on such deposits.

(b) Where it is to the advantage of the estate, the amount of cash that is reasonably necessary for orderly administration of the estate may be deposited in a checking account that does not earn interest which is maintained in a department of the corporation or association of which the trust company is a part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Investments and Purchase of Property [9730. - 9737.]

9730.

Pending distribution of the estate, the personal representative may invest money of the estate in possession of the personal representative in any one or more of the following:

(a) Direct obligations of the United States, or of the State of California, maturing not later than one year from the date of making the investment.

(b) An interest in a money market mutual fund registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1, et seq.) or an investment vehicle authorized for the collective investment of trust funds pursuant to Section 9.18 of Part 9 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the portfolios of which are
 limited to United States government obligations maturing not later than five years from the date of investment and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by United States government obligations.

(c) Units of a common trust fund described in Section 1585 of the Financial Code. The common trust fund shall have as its objective investment primarily in short term fixed income obligations and shall be permitted to value investments at cost pursuant to regulations of the appropriate regulatory authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 140.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9731.

(a) Pending distribution of the estate, upon a showing that it is to the advantage of the estate, the court may order that money of the estate in possession of the personal representative be invested in securities of the United States or of this state.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition stating the types of securities that are proposed to be purchased and the advantage to the estate of the purchase.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9732.

(a) The court may order that money of the estate in possession of the personal representative be invested in any manner provided by the will if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The time for filing claims has expired.

(2) All debts, as defined in Section 11401, have been paid or are sufficiently secured by mortgage or otherwise, or there is sufficient cash in the estate aside from the money to be invested to pay all the debts, or the court is otherwise satisfied that all the debts will be paid.

(3) The estate is
 not in a condition to be finally distributed.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition showing the general condition of the estate and the types of investments that are proposed to be made.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be delivered as provided in Section 1220. In addition, the petitioner shall cause notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to all known devisees of property which is proposed to be invested. Where the property proposed to be invested is devised to a trust or trustee, notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the trustee or, if the trustee has not yet accepted the trust, to the person
 named in the will as trustee. Delivery pursuant to this subdivision shall be to the person’s last known address as provided in Section 1220.

(d) If no objection has been filed by an interested person, the court may make an order authorizing or directing the personal representative to invest such portion of the money of the estate as the court deems advisable in the types of investments proposed in the petition and authorized by the will. If there is no objection by an interested person and no substantial reason why some or all of the investment powers given by the will should not be exercised, the court shall make the order. The order may be for a limited period or until the administration of the estate is completed. Upon petition of the personal representative or any interested person, the order may be renewed, modified, or terminated at any
 time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 76.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9733.

(a) Pending distribution of the estate or at the time the court makes an order for final distribution of the estate, on petition of the personal representative or any interested person, the court may, upon good cause shown, order that the personal representative purchase an annuity from an insurer admitted to do business in this state to satisfy a devise of an annuity or other direction in the will for periodic payments to a devisee.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9734.

(a) If an asset of the estate consists of an option right, the personal representative may exercise the option after authorization by order of court upon a showing that the exercise would be to the advantage of the estate and would be in the best interest of the interested persons. The personal representative may use any funds or property in the estate to acquire the property covered by the option.

(b) A petition under this section may be filed by the personal representative or any interested person.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9735.

(a) After authorization by order of court, the personal representative may purchase securities or commodities required to perform an incomplete contract of sale where the decedent died having sold but not delivered securities or commodities not owned by the decedent. The court’s order shall fix the terms and conditions of purchase.

(b) A petition under this section may be filed by the personal representative or by any party to the contract. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(c) No notice of hearing need be given where the maximum purchase price is fixed or where the securities or commodities are to be purchased on an established stock, bond, or commodity exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9736.

The personal representative may hold a security in the name of a nominee or in any other form without disclosure of the estate so that title to the security may pass by delivery.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9737.

(a) If an estate by reason of owning securities also owns or receives subscription rights for the purchase of additional securities, the personal representative may exercise the subscription rights after authorization by order of court upon a showing that it is to the advantage of the estate.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition stating the nature of the subscription rights and the advantage to the estate of exercising them.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Operation of Decedent’s Business [9760. - 9765.]

9760.

(a) As used in this section, “decedent’s business” means an unincorporated business or venture in which the decedent was engaged or which was wholly or partly owned by the decedent at the time of the decedent’s death, but does not include a business operated by a partnership in which the decedent was a partner.

(b) If it is to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons, the personal representative, with or without court authorization, may continue the operation of the decedent’s business; but the personal representative may not continue the operation of the decedent’s business for a period of more than six months from the date letters are first issued to a personal representative unless a court order has been obtained under this section authorizing the personal representative to continue the operation of the business. 

(c) The personal representative or any interested person may file a petition requesting an order (1) authorizing the personal representative to continue the operation of the decedent’s business or (2) directing the personal representative to discontinue the operation of the decedent’s business. The petition shall show the advantage to the estate and the benefit to the interested persons of the order requested. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(d) If a petition is filed under this section, the court may make an order that either:

(1) Authorizes the personal representative to continue the operation of the decedent’s business to such an extent and subject to such restrictions as the court determines to be to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons.

(2) Directs the personal representative to discontinue the operation of the decedent’s business within the time specified in, and in accordance with the provisions of, the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9761.

If a partnership existed between the decedent and another person at the time of the decedent’s death, on application of the personal representative, the court may order any surviving partner to render an account pursuant to Section 15510, 15634, or 16807 of the Corporations Code. An order under this section may be enforced by the court’s power to punish for contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9762.

(a) After authorization by order of court upon a showing that it would be to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons, the personal representative may continue as a general or a limited partner in any partnership in which the decedent was a general partner at the time of death. In its order, the court may specify any terms and conditions of the personal representative’s participation as a partner that the court determines are to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons, but any terms and conditions that are inconsistent with the terms of any written partnership agreement are subject to the written consent of all of the surviving
 partners.

(b) If there is a written partnership agreement permitting the decedent’s personal representative to participate as a partner, the personal representative has all the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided in the written partnership agreement, except as otherwise ordered by the court pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) If there is not a written partnership agreement, the personal representative has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations that the court specifies in its order pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) To obtain an order under this section, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition showing that the order requested would be to the advantage of the estate and in the
 best interest of the interested persons. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220. In addition, unless the court otherwise orders, the petitioner, not less than 15 days before the hearing, shall cause notice of hearing and a copy of the petition to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to each of the surviving general partners at his or her last known address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 77.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9763.

(a) If the decedent was a general partner, the personal representative may commence and maintain any action against the surviving partner that the decedent could have commenced and maintained.

(b) The personal representative may exercise the decedent’s rights as a limited partner as provided in Section 15675 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9764.

(a) The personal representative of the estate of a deceased attorney who was engaged in a practice of law at the time of his or her death or other person interested in the estate may bring a petition for appointment of an active member of the State Bar of California to take control of the files and assets of the practice of the deceased member.

(b) The petition may be filed and heard on such notice that the court determines is in the best interests of the estate of the deceased member. If the petition alleges that the immediate appointment of a practice administrator is required to safeguard the interests of the estate, the court may dispense with notice only if the personal representative is the petitioner or has joined in the petition or has otherwise waived notice of hearing on the petition.

(c) The petition shall indicate the powers sought for the practice administrator from the list of powers set forth in Section 6185 of the Business and Professions Code. These powers shall be specifically listed in the order appointing the practice administrator.

(d) The petition shall allege the value of the assets that are to come under the control of the practice administrator, including, but not limited by the amount of funds in all accounts used by the deceased member. The court shall require the filing of a surety bond in the amount of the value of the personal property to be filed with the court by the practice administrator. No action may be taken by the practice administrator unless a bond has been fully filed with the court.

(e) The practice administrator shall not be the attorney representing the personal representative.

(f) The court shall appoint the attorney nominated by the deceased member in a writing, including, but not limited to, the deceased member’s will, unless the court concludes that the appointment of the nominated person would be contrary to the best interests of the estate or would create a conflict of interest with any of the clients of the deceased member.

(g) The practice administrator shall be compensated only upon order of the court making the appointment for his or her reasonable and necessary services. The law practice shall be the source of the compensation for the practice administrator unless the assets are insufficient in which case, the compensation of the practice administrator shall be charged against the assets of the estate as a cost of administration. The practice administrator shall also be entitled to reimbursement of his or her costs.

(h) Upon conclusion of the services of the practice administrator, the practice administrator shall render an accounting and petition for its approval by the superior court making the appointment. Upon settlement of the accounting, the practice administrator shall be discharged and the surety on his or her bond exonerated.

(i) For the purposes of this section, the person appointed to take control of the practice of the deceased member shall be referred to as the “practice administrator” and the decedent shall be referred to as the “deceased member.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 682, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9765.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2024, when a professional fiduciary is deceased and a vacancy exists, the deceased fiduciary’s personal representative, trustee, or interested person may petition for the appointment of one or more individuals, qualified to act as a professional fiduciary under the Professional Fiduciaries Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), as a professional fiduciary practice administrator, to take control of the deceased professional fiduciary’s files and to be appointed as temporary successor as to those matters for which a vacancy exists as a result of the professional fiduciary’s death.

(b) The petition
 shall request an order appointing a professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor, with all of the powers and duties held by the deceased fiduciary, in each matter in which the deceased fiduciary was acting in a representative capacity, including guardianships of the estate, conservatorships of the person and estate, decedent’s estates, court-supervised trusts, and non-court-supervised trusts.

(c) The court shall require the professional fiduciary practice administrator to file a surety bond in each matter in which the professional fiduciary practice administrator is appointed temporary successor, in the amount currently required of the deceased fiduciary or in another amount as the court deems appropriate.

(d) The court may appoint as the professional fiduciary
 practice administrator the professional fiduciary nominated by the deceased professional fiduciary in a writing, including, but not limited to, the decedent’s will or trust, or in the absence thereof, the person nominated by the person having legal standing to act on behalf of the deceased professional fiduciary. The court shall not make the appointment if the court concludes that the appointment of the nominated person would be contrary to the best interests of, or would create a conflict of interest with, any interested party in a matter in which the deceased fiduciary was acting in a fiduciary capacity.

(e) The appointment of the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor shall terminate, in each of the matters in which the professional fiduciary practice administrator was appointed as temporary successor,
 45 days after the entry of the order appointing the professional fiduciary practice administrator, or earlier if another person is appointed.

(f) Notice of the hearing on the petition for appointment of a professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor shall be given to all persons entitled to notice in each of the matters that are the subject of the petition. The court may dispense with notice if the court determines that the immediate appointment of a professional fiduciary practice administrator is required to safeguard the interests of an individual or an asset in a matter in which the deceased fiduciary was acting in a representative capacity.

(g) The professional fiduciary practice administrator shall be compensated for services provided and
 reimbursement of costs
 incurred in each matter solely from the assets of that matter subject to the provisions of the applicable document or as determined by the court, and in no event more than the incapacitated fiduciary would have been paid.

(h) The professional fiduciary practice administrator shall do all of the following:

(1) File a copy of the order appointing the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor in each of the matters in which the court appoints the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor.

(2) Take control and review all files and writings maintained by the deceased fiduciary for matters in which the deceased fiduciary was acting in a representative
 capacity.

(3) Within 15 days after the entry of the order appointing the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor, provide written notice to all interested parties as to each matter in which the deceased fiduciary was acting in a representative capacity who can be reasonably ascertained and located to inform those parties of the appointment of the professional fiduciary practice administrator as temporary successor. The notice shall advise the parties of the need for the appointment for a permanent successor, which shall include the following:

(A) The right of the parties to petition the court for the appointment of a permanent successor.

(B) The right of any interested party to nominate
 an individual to act as permanent successor, and then the obligation of the professional fiduciary practice administrator to petition for the appointment of the individual nominated, provided an interested party provides the professional fiduciary practice administrator with the name of their nominee within 15 days after the date notice was given.

(C) The ability of the professional fiduciary practice administrator, in the event that none of the interested parties act within the time prescribed above, under subparagraph (A) or (B), to petition the court for appointment of a permanent successor.

(4) Upon the court’s appointment of a permanent successor, the professional fiduciary practice administrator shall file an account and report on behalf of the deceased fiduciary for
 any period of time the deceased fiduciary would have been required to account, as well as for the period of time the professional fiduciary practice administrator served as temporary successor. As part of that account and report, the professional fiduciary practice administrator may request compensation both on behalf of the deceased fiduciary, for services rendered prior to their death, and on their own behalf for services rendered after the deceased fiduciary’s death as temporary successor, subject to any limitation on fees and costs that existed for the deceased fiduciary, and may request discharge and exoneration of bond. The account filed for the period during which the matter was administered by the now deceased fiduciary may be verified on information and belief.

(5) Comply with any other obligations imposed by the court.

(i) Each of the time periods prescribed in this section may be extended by the court if the court determines that good cause exists, and if the court determines that the extension is in the best interest of the minor, the conservatee, the decedent’s estate, or the current income beneficiaries under a trust, as applicable.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Professional fiduciary practice administrator” means the person appointed pursuant to this section to take over the responsibilities from the deceased fiduciary.

(2) “Vacancy” means that the instrument under which the deceased fiduciary was acting does not name a successor to fill the
 vacancy, the instrument under which the deceased fiduciary was acting does not provide a nonjudicial method to fill the vacancy, or a cofiduciary, authorized to act solely, was not acting with the deceased fiduciary.

(k) This section does not limit the authority granted to the court under subdivision (j) of Section 2250, Section 8523, and subdivision (e) of Section 15642.

(l) The Judicial Council shall create or revise any forms or rules necessary to implement this section no later than January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 59.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Abandonment of Tangible Personal Property [9780. - 9788.]

9780.

Unless the property is specifically devised, subject to the requirements of this chapter, the personal representative may dispose of or abandon tangible personal property where the cost of collecting, maintaining, and safeguarding the property would exceed its fair market value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9781.

Unless otherwise provided in the will, subject to the requirements of this chapter, the personal representative may exercise the power provided in Section 9780 without court authorization or approval.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9782.

(a) Except as provided in Section 9785, before disposing of or abandoning property under Section 9780, the personal representative shall give notice of the proposed disposition or abandonment as provided in subdivision (c) to all of the following:

(1) Each known devisee whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed action.

(2) Each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed action.

(3) Each person who has filed a request for special notice pursuant to Section 1250.

(4) The Attorney General, at the office of the Attorney General in Sacramento, if any portion of the estate is to escheat to the state and its interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed action.

(b) The notice of the proposed disposition or abandonment shall describe the property to be disposed of or abandoned, indicate the manner in which the property is to be disposed of or abandoned, and specify the date on or after which the property will be disposed of or abandoned.

(c) The notice shall be delivered personally to each person required to be given notice or shall be sent by mail to the person at the person’s last known address. If the notice is delivered personally, it shall be delivered to the person not less than five days before the date specified in the notice as the date on or after which the property will be disposed of or abandoned. If the notice is sent by mail, it shall be deposited in the mail not less than 10 days before the date specified in the notice as the date on or after which the property will be disposed of or abandoned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9783.
